Washington statutes.
RCW 43.376.020

Government-to-government relationships—State agency duties.

In establishing a government-to-government relationship with Indian tribes, state agencies must:

(1) Make reasonable efforts to collaborate with Indian tribes in the development of policies, agreements, and program implementation that directly affect Indian tribes and develop a consultation process that is used by the agency for issues involving specific Indian tribes. Covered agencies, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, subject to the requirements of chapter 70A.02 RCW, must offer consultation with Indian tribes on the actions specified in RCW 70A.02.100. State agencies described in RCW 70A.65.305 must offer consultation with Indian tribes on the actions specified in RCW 70A.65.305;

(2) Designate a tribal liaison who reports directly to the head of the state agency;

(3) Ensure that tribal liaisons who interact with Indian tribes and the executive directors of state agencies receive training as described in RCW 43.376.040; and

(4) Submit an annual report to the governor on activities of the state agency involving Indian tribes and on implementation of this chapter.

[ 2022 c 253 s 3. Prior: 2021 c 316 s 40; 2021 c 314 s 23; 2012 c 122 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 316: See RCW 70A.65.900.

Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 314: See note following RCW 70A.02.005.